Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1658
Tuition Recovery Cash Fund; references in advertising or information authorized.

A private postsecondary career school may include references to the Tuition Recovery Cash Fund in advertising or information provided to students or prospective students. Any such reference shall clearly describe the protection and limitations prescribed in section 85-1657 and the rules and regulations.

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 56;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2863;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 58.